District of Columbia statutes.
3-420

Rules.

The Mayor may promulgate rules consistent with this chapter.

May 22, 1984, D.C. Law 5-84, § 22a
as added Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 902(c), 48 DCR 6981
This section is referenced in § 3-405, § 3-406, and § 3-407.
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 2(c) of Funeral Services Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-219, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3461).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2(c) of Funeral Services Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-8, March 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2487).